Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1072.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriations; department of economic security; reporting requirements; intent A. The sum of $46,000,000 from the state general fund and $84,201,000 in medicaid expenditure authority are appropriated in each of fiscal years 2026-2027, 2027-2028, 2028-2029, 2029-2030 and 2030-2031 to the department of economic security to provide reimbursement rate increases for home and community-based services to individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities. B. The sum of $4,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in each of fiscal years 2026-2027, 2027-2028, 2028-2029, 2029-2030 and 2030-2031 to the department of economic security to provide reimbursement rate increases for room and board services for individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities. C. The department of economic security shall provide reimbursement rate increases for home and community-based services that are provided to individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities so that each service receives an increase. Before implementing provider rate increases, the department must engage community stakeholders regarding the department's plans to increase the reimbursement rates. D. On or before September 1 in each fiscal year monies are appropriated pursuant to subsections A and B of this section, the department of economic security shall report to the joint legislative budget committee the increased provider rates adopted pursuant to this section.  The department shall implement the increased provider rates on or before October 1 of each fiscal year monies are appropriated pursuant to subsections A and B of this section. E. The department of economic security shall issue a nationally recognized survey to its qualified vendors to collect data on the state of the direct support professional workforce for home and community-based services, including the length of employment, turnover rates and vacancy rates, in each fiscal year monies are appropriated pursuant to subsections A and B of this section and report the findings to the joint legislative budget committee when three years of data is collected. The joint legislative budget committee shall review the direct support professional workforce data to determine whether improvements have occurred in the average length of employment, turnover rates and vacancy rates of the direct support professional workforce for home and community-based services. If improvements have not occurred in the direct support professional workforce for home and community-based services, the joint legislative budget committee may recommend that the funding appropriated in subsections A and B of this section for fiscal years 2029-2030 and 2030-2031 not occur. F. The legislature intends that the appropriations made in subsections A and B of this section be considered ongoing funding in future years.